District of Columbia statutes.
4-212.01

Payment to incapacitated recipient.

Whenever a recipient has been found by the Mayor to be incapable of taking care of himself or herself, his or her property, or his or her money, and a person has been judicially appointed as legal representative, or a responsible person has been appointed by the Mayor, on behalf of such incapacitated individual for the purpose of receiving and managing such individual’s public assistance payments (whether or not he is such individual’s legal representative for other purposes), public assistance payments may be made on behalf of such individual to such judicially appointed legal representative, or to such responsible person appointed by the Mayor.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1201, 29 DCR 1060

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-212.1.